en: Mineral waters, Bottled mineral waters
bg: Минерална вода
ca: Aigües minerals
cs: Minerální vody
da: Mineralvand
de: Mineralwasser, Mineralwässer
es: Aguas minerales
fi: kivennäisvedet
fr: Eaux minérales, eau minérale, Eau minérale en bouteille
he: מים מינרליים
hr: mineralne vode, mineralna voda
hu: Ásványvizek, Ásványvíz, Palackos ásványvíz
it: Acque minerali, acqua minerale
ja: ミネラルウォーター, 鉱泉水
lt: Mineralinis vanduo
nl: Mineraalwaters, Mineraalwater, Mineraal water
pl: Woda mineralna
pt: Água Mineral
ru: Минеральная вода, Минеральные воды, Минералка
sv: Mineralvatten
zh: 矿泉水, 矿物质水

en: Low mineral bottled waters, Bottled waters with low mineralization levels
fr: Eau minérale embouteillée faiblement minéralisée
hr: Niskomineralne flaširane vode
pl: Woda mineralna niskozmineralizowana

en: Carbonated mineral waters
de: Mineralwasser mit Kohlensäure, Mineralwässer mit Kohlensäure
es: Aguas minerales carbonatadas
fi: hiilihapotetut kivennäisvedet
fr: Eaux minérales gazeuses, eau minérale gazeuse, eaux minérales pétillantes, eau minérale pétillante
hr: Gazirane mineralne vode
hu: Szénsavas ásványvizek, Szénsavas ásványvíz
it: Acqua minerale frizzante, Acqua minerale gassata, Acqua minerale gasata
lt: Gazuotas mineralinis vanduo
nl: Koolzuurhoudende mineraalwaters, Met koolzuur versterkt mineraalwater
pl: Woda mineralna gazowana
ru: Газированная минеральная вода, Минеральная газированная вода
sv: Kolsyrade mineralvatten

en: Natural mineral waters
bg: Натурална минерална вода
ca: Aigua mineral natural
da: Naturlige mineralvand
de: natürliches Mineralwasser, natürliche Mineralwässer
es: Aguas minerales naturales
fi: luonnolliset kivennäisvedet
fr: Eaux minérales naturelles, eau minérale naturelle
he: מים מינרלים טבעיים
hr: Prirodne mineralne vode
hu: Természetes ásványvizek, Természetes ásványvíz
it: Acque minerali naturali
lt: Natūralus mineralinis vanduo
nl: Natuurlijke mineraalwaters, Natuurlijk mineraalwater
pl: Naturalna woda mineralna
pt: Águas minerais naturais
ru: Природная минеральная вода
sv: Naturliga mineralvatten
zh: 天然矿泉水, 天然矿物质水

en: Carbonated natural mineral waters
de: natürliches Mineralwasser mit Kohlensäure versetzt, natürliche Mineralwässer mit Kohlensäure versetzt
es: Aguas minerales naturales carbonatadas
fi: hiilihapotetut luontaiset kivennäisvedet
fr: Eau minérale naturelle gazéifiée
hr: Gazirane prirodne mineralne vode
hu: Szénsavas természetes ásványvizek, Szénsavas természetes ásványvíz
it: Acque minerali naturali carbonate
lt: Gazuotas natūralus mineralinis vanduo
nl: Koolzuurhoudend natuurlijk mineraalwater
sv: Kolsyrade naturliga mineralvatten

en: Mildly carbonated natural mineral water
de: natürliches Mineralwasser mit wenig Kohlensäure versetzt, natürliche Mineralwässer mit wenig Kohlensäure versetzt
fi: kevyesti hiilihapotettu luonnollinen kivennäisvesi
fr: Eau minérale naturelle légèrement gazéifiée
hr: Blago gazirana prirodna mineralna voda
it: Acqua minerale naturale mediamente carbonata
lt: Švelniai gazuotas natūralus mineralinis vanduo
nl: Koolzuurhoudende (mild) mineraalwaters, Met weinig koolzuur versterkt mineraalwater
sv: Lätt kolsyrade naturliga mineralvatten

en: Non-carbonated natural mineral waters, Bottled mineral water non-carbonated
de: natürliches Mineralwasser ohne Kohlensäure, natürliche Mineralwässer ohne Kohlensäure, stilles natürliches Mineralwasser, stille natürliche Mineralwässer
es: Agua mineral no carbonatada
fi: hiilihapottamattomat luontaiset kivennäisvedet
fr: Eau minérale naturelle non gazeuse, Eau minérale plate
hr: Negazirane prirodne mineralne vode
hu: Szénsavmentes természetes ásványvizek, Szénsavmentes természetes ásványvíz
it: Acque minerali naturali non carbonate
lt: Negazuotas natūralus mineralinis vanduo, Negazuotas mineralinis vanduo buteliuose
nl: Koolzuurvrije natuurlijke mineraalwaters, Koolzuurvrij natuurlijk mineraalwater, Natuurlijke mineraalwaters zonder koolzuur

en: Spring waters
bg: Изворна вода
ca: Aigües de manantial
cs: Pramenitá voda
da: Kildevand
de: Quellwasser, Quellwässer
es: Aguas de manantial
fi: lähdevedet
fr: Eaux de sources, Eau de source
he: מי מעיין
hr: Izvorske vode
hu: Forrásvizek, Forrásvíz
it: Acque di sorgente, acqua di sorgente
ja: 湧き水
lt: Šaltinio vanduo
nl: Bronwaters, Bronwater
pl: Woda źródlana, Wody źródlane
pt: Águas de nascente
ru: Ключевая вода
sv: Källvatten
zh: 泉水

en: Table waters
bg: Трапезна вода
de: Tafelwasser, Tafelwässer
fr: Eaux de table
hr: Stolne vode
lt: Stalo vanduo
nl: Tafelwaters, Tafelwater
sv: Bordsvatten

en: Medicinal waters
de: Heilwasser, Heilwässer
fr: Eaux médicinales
hr: Ljekovite vode
hu: Gyógyvizek, Gyógyvíz
nl: Geneeskrachtige waters, Geneeskrachtig water
zh: 药用水, 愈合水

en: Flavored waters, Flavored water
bg: Ароматизирана вода
de: Wasser mit Geschmack, Wässer mit Geschmack
es: Agua aromatizada
fi: maustetut vedet
fr: Eaux aromatisées, eau aromatisée
hr: Aromatizirane vode
hu: Ízesített vizek, Ízesített víz
it: Acque aromatizzate, acqua aromatizzata
lt: Aromatizuoti vandenys, aromatizuotas vanduo
nl: Gearomatiseerde waters, Gearomatiseerd water, Waters met smaak, Water met smaak
pl: Wody smakowe, woda smakowa
ro: Ape aromate, Ape cu arome, Apă aromată
sv: Vatten med smak

en: Flavored spring waters, flavored spring water
fr: Eaux de sources aromatisées, eau de source aromatisée
hu: Ízesített forrásvizek, Ízesített forrásvíz
sv: Källvatten med smak

en: Unsweetened flavored waters, non-sweetened flavored waters, non-sugared flavored waters
de: Zuckerfreies Wasser mit Geschmack
fr: Eaux aromatisées sans sucre ajouté, eau aromatisée sans sucre ajouté, eaux aromatisées non sucrées, eau aromatisée non sucrée
hr: Nezaslađene vode s okusom
nl: Suikervrije waters, Suikervrij water

en: Bottled water flavoured without sugar or artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson à l'eau minérale aromatisée non sucrée sans édulcorant, Boisson à l'eau de source aromatisée non sucrée sans édulcorant

en: Flavored sparkling waters, Sparkling flavored waters, Flavoured carbonated waters
da: Danskvand med smag
de: Aromatisierte Sprudelwasser, Aromatisierte Mineralwasser
es: Agua con gas aromatizada, Agua carbonatada aromatizada
fi: Maustetut porevedet
fr: Eaux gazeuses aromatisées, eux aromatisées gazeuses
hr: Aromatizirane gazirane vode
hu: Ízesített szénsavas vizek, Ízesített szénsavas víz
it: Acque gassate aromatizzate, acqua aromatizzata gassata
lt: Aromatizuotas gazuotas vanduo, Gazuotas aromatizuotas vanduo
nl: Mineraalwater met smaak
sv: Kolsyrade vatten med smak

en: Flavored carbonated mineral waters
hu: Ízesített szénsavas ásványvizek, Ízesített szénsavas ásványvíz
sv: Kolsyrade mineralvatten med smak

en: Flavored bottled water
hu: Ízesített palackozott víz
sv: Flaskvatten med smak

en: Bottled water flavoured with sugar
fr: Boisson à l'eau minérale aromatisée sucrée, Boisson à l'eau de source aromatisée sucrée

en: Bottled water flavoured without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson à l'eau minérale ou de source aromatisée non sucrée avec édulcorants

en: Mountain waters, Mountain water
de: Bergwasser, Bergwässer
fr: Eaux de montagne, eau de montagne
hr: Planinske vode
nl: Bergwaters, Bergwater
sv: Bergvatten